Florida, session 2026, SB1038.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 44 45 Section 1.âSection 215.991, Florida Statutes, is created to 46 read: 47 215.991âShort title.âSections 215.991-215.994 shall be 48 known and may be cited as the âFlorida Strategic Cryptocurrency 49 Reserve Act.â 50 Section 2.âSection 215.992, Florida Statutes, is created to 51 read: 52 215.992âDefinitions relating to the Florida Strategic 53 Cryptocurrency Reserve Act.âAs used in this section and ss. 54 215.993 and 215.994, the term: 55 (1)ââAirdropâ means a gratuitous distribution of 56 cryptocurrency to users of a blockchain or protocol, generally 57 made in a broad, equitable, and nondiscretionary manner. 58 (2)ââBlockchainâ means a mathematically secured, 59 chronological, decentralized, distributed, and digital ledger or 60 database that consists of records of transactions that cannot be 61 altered retroactively. 62 (3)ââCryptocurrencyâ means a virtual currency that is not 63 issued by any central authority, is designed to function as a 64 medium of exchange, and uses encryption technology to regulate 65 the generation of units of currency, to verify fund transfers, 66 and to prevent counterfeiting. 67 (4)ââDistributed ledgerâ means technology in which data is 68 shared across a network that creates a public digital ledger of 69 verified transactions or information among network participants 70 and in which cryptography is used to link the data to maintain 71 the integrity of the public ledger and execute other functions. 72 (5)ââForkâ means a change to the protocol of a distributed 73 ledger system which creates a separate ledger, which may result 74 in a new cryptocurrency that shares a common transaction history 75 with the previous cryptocurrency up to the point of change. 76 (6)ââGovernmental entityâ has the same meaning as in s. 77 215.986. 78 (7)ââPrivate keyâ means confidential cryptographic data 79 that allows a person or an entity to access, control, or 80 authorize transactions involving cryptocurrency or virtual 81 currency. 82 (8)ââQualified custodianâ means a state financial 83 institution or a federally chartered institution or other entity 84 regulated by the state which is permitted to act as a custodian 85 of virtual currencies on behalf of clients. 86 (9)ââQualified liquidity providerâ means an entity that: 87 (a)âIs licensed or regulated under applicable federal or 88 state law; 89 (b)âMaintains audited financial statements prepared by an 90 independent certified public accountant; 91 (c)âHas at least 5 years of experience trading in the 92 digital assets industry; 93 (d)âMaintains an office and has a registered principal in 94 this state; and 95 (e)âSubmits to the Chief Financial Officer a certification, 96 in a form prescribed by the Chief Financial Officer, attesting 97 that it meets the criteria in paragraphs (a)-(d). 98 (10)ââReserveâ means the Florida Strategic Cryptocurrency 99 Reserve established under ss. 215.993 and 215.994. 100 (11)ââSecure custody solutionâ means a technological 101 product or a blended product and service that meets all of the 102 following criteria: 103 (a)âThe cryptographic private keys are: 104 1.âExclusively known by and accessible to the governmental 105 entity; 106 2.âContained within an encrypted environment and accessible 107 only through end-to-end encrypted channels; and 108 3.âNot stored on, or accessible through, a smartphone. 109 (b)âThe hardware containing the cryptographic private keys 110 is maintained in at least two geographically diverse, secure 111 data centers. 112 (c)âA multiparty governance structure for authorizing 113 transactions is implemented, user access control is enforced, 114 and all user-initiated actions are logged. 115 (d)âThe provider implements a disaster recovery protocol 116 ensuring state access to assets if the provider becomes 117 unavailable. 118 (e)âThe technological product or blended product and 119 service undergoes regular code audits and penetration testing, 120 with identified vulnerabilities promptly addressed. 121 (12)ââVirtual currencyâ has the same meaning as in s. 122 896.101(2). 123 Section 3.âSection 215.993, Florida Statutes, is created to 124 read: 125 215.993âAdministration of the Florida Strategic 126 Cryptocurrency Reserve.â 127 (1)âIn administering and managing the reserve, the Chief 128 Financial Officer may acquire, exchange, sell, supervise, 129 manage, or retain cryptocurrency or any other asset authorized 130 under this section and shall exercise the judgment and care that 131 a prudent investor would exercise, in light of the purposes, 132 terms, distribution requirements, and other circumstances of the 133 reserve, by considering the reserve as a whole rather than a 134 single investment. The reasonable costs of administering and 135 managing the reserve may be paid from cryptocurrency held in the 136 reserve or from the net proceeds of the sale or exchange of such 137 cryptocurrency. 138 (2)âThe Chief Financial Officer may purchase a 139 cryptocurrency for the reserve only if the cryptocurrency has 140 had an average market capitalization of at least $500 billion 141 during the preceding 24-month period. 142 (3)âThe Chief Financial Officer may contract with third 143 party entities for the administration or management of the 144 reserve, including contracting with any of the following 145 entities: 146 (a)âA technology provider of a secure custody solution. 147 (b)âA certified public accountant, to perform an 148 independent audit of the reserve. 149 (c)âA qualified custodian who utilizes a secure custody 150 solution. 151 (d)âA qualified liquidity provider, to facilitate the 152 purchase and sale of assets in the reserve. 153 (4)âThe Chief Financial Officer may invest in derivative 154 instruments of cryptocurrency authorized under s. 215.994(2)(c) 155 if the Chief Financial Officer determines that such investment 156 is in the best interest of the state. 157 (5)(a)âMoneys in the reserve may be used only for 158 investment activities authorized under this section, for 159 temporary cash-management purposes authorized under paragraph 160 (b), and for paying the reasonable costs of administering and 161 managing the reserve. 162 (b)âThe Chief Financial Officer may liquidate assets of the 163 reserve and temporarily transfer the resulting moneys to the 164 State Treasury if required to comply with a specific 165 appropriation by operation of law or order by the Governor. 166 (c)âMoneys temporarily transferred under paragraph (b) must 167 be returned to the reserve as soon as practicable, together with 168 any interest earned on such moneys while held in the State 169 Treasury. 170 (6)(a)âThe Florida Strategic Cryptocurrency Reserve 171 Advisory Committee is created to advise the Chief Financial 172 Officer in the administration and management of the reserve. 173 (b)âThe committee shall consist of five members, as 174 follows: 175 1.âThe Chief Financial Officer, who shall serve as chair; 176 and 177 2.âFour members appointed by the Chief Financial Officer by 178 October 1, 2026, as follows: 179 a.âThree members with expertise in cryptocurrency 180 investments; and 181 b.âOne member with expertise in digital asset security. 182 (c)âThe committee shall advise on matters relating to: 183 1.âThe valuation of assets held in the reserve; 184 2.âPrudent investment policies, including investment 185 objectives and asset allocation standards; and 186 3.âPrudent custody and security practices for the reserve. 187 (d)âMembers of the committee shall serve without 188 compensation but may be reimbursed for per diem and travel 189 expenses in accordance with s. 112.061, if applicable. 190 (e)âMembers appointed by the Chief Financial Officer serve 191 at the pleasure of the Chief Financial Officer. 192 (7)âBeginning December 31, 2026, and biennially thereafter, 193 the Chief Financial Officer shall submit a report to the 194 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of 195 Representatives which includes all of the following: 196 (a)âThe amount of cryptocurrency held in the reserve on the 197 last day of the preceding state fiscal year. 198 (b)âThe estimated monetary value of the cryptocurrency held 199 in the reserve on the last day of the preceding state fiscal 200 year. 201 (c)âA summary of any changes in the amount and estimated 202 monetary value of cryptocurrency held in the reserve during the 203 preceding state fiscal year, disaggregated by cryptocurrency 204 type. 205 (d)âA description of the actions taken by the Chief 206 Financial Officer to administer and manage the reserve during 207 the preceding state fiscal year. 208 (8)âUpon termination of the reserve under s. 215.994(4), 209 the Chief Financial Officer shall liquidate any remaining assets 210 of the reserve and transfer the resulting moneys to the General 211 Revenue Fund. 212 (9)âThe Chief Financial Officer shall adopt rules as 213 necessary to administer this section. 214 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect on July 1, 2026, but 215 only if SB 1040 or similar legislation takes effect, if such 216 legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an 217 extension thereof and becomes a law.